Utah statutes.
22-3-501.   Disbursements from income.
A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the extent
that they are not disbursements to which Subsection 22-3-201(2)(b) or (c)
applies:
(1)  1/2 of the regular compensation of the trustee and of any person
providing investment advisory or custodial services to the trustee;
(2)  1/2 of all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other
matters that involve both the income and remainder interests;
(3)  all of the other ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the
administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the
distribution of income, including interest, ordinary repairs, regularly
recurring taxes assessed against principal, and expenses of a proceeding or
other matter that concerns primarily the income interest; and
(4)  recurring premiums on insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or
the loss of income from or use of the asset.
